California statutes. Fish and Game Code
(d) It is unlawful for any person to obtain, or attempt to obtain, a sturgeon egg processing license pursuant to this division during the period of prohibition prescribed in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1403, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 7. REFUGES [10500. - 10932.]



CHAPTER 1. Refuges and Other Protected Areas [10500. - 10741.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [10500. - 10514.]

10500.

Except under a permit or specific authorization, it is unlawful to do any of the following:

(a) To take or possess a bird or mammal in a game refuge.

(b) To use or have in possession in a game refuge, a firearm, BB device as defined in Section 16250 of the Penal Code, crossbow, bow and arrow, or a trap or other contrivance designed to be, or capable of being, used to take birds or mammals, or to discharge a firearm or BB device or to release an arrow or crossbow bolt into a game refuge.

(c) To take or possess a fish or amphibian in a fish refuge, or to use or have in possession in that refuge a contrivance designed to
 be used for catching fish.

(d) To take or possess a bird, discharge a firearm or BB device, or release an arrow or crossbow bolt, within or into a waterfowl refuge.

(e) To take or possess a quail in a quail refuge.

(f) To take or possess an invertebrate or specimen of marine plant life in a marine life refuge.

(g) To take or possess a clam or an instrument or apparatus capable of being used to dig clams in a clam refuge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 95.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10501.

Before the commission opens any game refuge for the taking of deer, a public hearing shall be held at which at least one member of the commission shall be in attendance and such officers and employees of the department as are deemed necessary or are requested by interested parties, notice of which has been published at least once and at least 30 days prior to the hearing in a newspaper of general circulation which is printed and published in the county, or one of the counties, in which the area lies. If there is no newspaper of general circulation in any such county, the notice shall be published in such newspaper of general circulation as the commission determines will be most likely to give notice to the inhabitants of the area and such determination by the commission shall be final and conclusive.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

10501.5.

(a) It is unlawful to fly any aircraft, including any airplane or helicopter, less than 3,000 feet above water or land over the Sespe Condor Sanctuary, and less than 1,000 feet above water or land over the A:o Nuevo State Reserve, the Farallon Islands Game Refuge, the Point Lobos State Reserve, the California Sea Otter Game Refuge, and Anacapa, San Miguel, Santa Barbara, and San Nicolas Islands, except for rescue operations, in case of any emergency, or for scientific or filmmaking purposes under a permit issued by the department after a review of potential biological impacts.

(b) This section does not apply to the landing of any aircraft, including any airplane or helicopter, on Anacapa, San Miguel, Santa Barbara, San Nicolas, and Farallon Islands for administrative or operational purposes of the National Park Service, the United States Navy, or the United States Coast Guard.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 431, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

10502.

The commission may:

(a) Exercise control over all mammals and birds in a game refuge, and exercise control over all fish in a fish refuge.

(b) Authorize the department to issue, under any restrictions it deems best, permits that authorize the person named therein to carry, use, and possess, within a refuge, firearms, traps, or other contrivances for taking birds, mammals, fish, amphibians, or reptiles.

(c) Except as provided in Sections 10502.5, 10502.8, 10655, and 10657, authorize the department to issue permits that authorize the person named therein to take birds, mammals,
 fish, amphibians, or reptiles within a refuge.

(d) Adopt regulations not in conflict with any law for the protection of birds, mammals, fish, amphibians, reptiles, or marine life within a refuge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 96.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10502.5.

The director may appoint the Director of the Hopkins Marine Life Refuge. The Director of the Hopkins Marine Life Refuge may issue a permit to any person under which the person may enter the Hopkins Marine Life Refuge for the purpose of taking fish or marine plants under the conditions that the department determines necessary for the protection and propagation of fish and wildlife and related scientific purposes in that refuge.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1069, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10502.6.

(a) The director may appoint a Director of the Dana Point Marine Life Refuge.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, no state funds, including, but not limited to, the Fish and Game Preservation Fund, shall be used to pay the compensation or expenses of the Director of the Dana Point Marine Life Refuge. A city, county, or special district may use any funds, including state funds appropriated to the city, county, or special district, to pay the compensation and expenses of the director and a public postsecondary educational institution may use private or state funds to pay the compensation and expenses of the director.

(c) The Director of the Dana Point Marine Life Refuge may issue a permit authorizing any person to enter the Dana Point Marine Life Refuge for the purpose of taking fish or marine plants under the conditions that the department determines to be necessary for the protection and propagation of fish and wildlife and related scientific purposes in that refuge.

(d) The Director of the Dana Point Marine Life Refuge shall erect and maintain signs identifying the boundaries of the Dana Point Marine Life Refuge. The signs shall contain notification regarding the permit requirements of the refuge. The signs shall specify that an access permit shall be obtained from the Director of the Dana Point Marine Life Refuge and a scientific collector’s permit from the department in order to take any fish or specimen of marine plant life.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 259, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

10502.7.

(a) The director may appoint the Director of the Bodega Marine Life Refuge.

(b) The Director of the Bodega Marine Life Refuge may authorize any person to enter the Bodega Marine Life Refuge for the purpose of taking fish, invertebrates, or marine plants for scientific study and to take or possess fish, invertebrates, or marine plants for scientific study.

(c) The Director of the Bodega Marine Life Refuge may authorize any person to anchor a vessel in the Bodega Marine Life Refuge for the purpose of scientific study.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 502, Sec. 4.   Effective September 27, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

10502.8.

(a) The director may appoint the Director of the Catalina Marine Science Center Marine Life Refuge.

(b) The Director of the Catalina Marine Science Center Marine Life Refuge may authorize any person to enter the Catalina Marine Science Center Marine Life Refuge for the purpose of taking fish or marine plants under the conditions that the department determines necessary for the protection and propagation of fish and wildlife and related scientific purposes in that refuge.

(c) The Director of the Catalina Marine Science Center Marine Life Refuge, upon recommendation of the Director of the Catalina Marine Science Center, may authorize any person involved in oceanographic and scientific research in and around Santa Catalina Island to anchor or moor a vessel in the Catalina Marine Science Center Marine Life Refuge.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 682, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10503.

For the purposes of propagating, feeding, and protecting birds, mammals, fish, amphibians, and reptiles, the commission may do all of the following:

(a) Accept, on behalf of the state, donations of an interest in land within a refuge.

(b) Accept, on behalf of the state, from a person owning and in possession of patented land, other than land covered and uncovered by the ordinary daily tide of the Pacific Ocean, the right to preserve and protect all birds, mammals, fish, amphibians, and reptiles on the patented land.

(c) Accept, on behalf of the state, donations of birds,
 mammals, fish, amphibians, and reptiles, and of money given or appropriated. Those donations shall be used for the purposes for which they are accepted, and, as nearly as may be, for any purpose indicated by the donor.

(d) Acquire, by purchase, lease, rental, or otherwise, and occupy, develop, maintain, use, and administer land, or land and nonmarine water, or land and nonmarine water rights, suitable for state game farms or game refuges.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 97.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10504.

Any property acquired for game refuges shall be acquired in the name of the State, and shall, at all times, be subject to such regulations as may be prescribed from time to time by the commission for the occupation, use, operation, protection, and administration of such property as game refuges.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

10505.

The department shall do all things necessary to secure a valid title in the State to the property acquired for game refuges, but no payment shall be made therefor until the title is satisfactory to the Attorney General and is vested in the State. The acquisition of the property by the State is not prohibited by reason of rights of way, easements, or reservations, which, from their nature, in the opinion of the department, will in no manner interfere with the use of the property for the purpose for which it is acquired.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

10506.

Nothing in this code prohibits the possession of firearms, BB devices as defined in Section 16250 of the Penal Code, crossbows and bolts, or bows and arrows by persons when traveling through any game refuges when the firearms are taken apart or encased and unloaded and the bows are unstrung or stored separately from any arrow or bolt. When the traveling is done on a route other than a public highway or other public thoroughfare or right of way, notice shall be given to the department at least 24 hours before that traveling. The notice shall give the name and address of the person intending to travel through the refuge, the name of the refuge, the approximate route, and the approximate time when that person intends to travel through the
 refuge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 178, Sec. 32.   (SB 1115)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 107 of Ch. 178.)
-------------------------------------------

10507.

It is lawful for a person who has given the notice provided for in Section 10506 to transport a bird or mammal through a game refuge, if lawfully taken outside the refuge, and if the bird or mammal is carried openly and during the time between one hour before sunrise and one hour after sunset.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 98.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10508.

The department and the district attorney, sheriff, and all peace officers of the county in which any refuge or part thereof is situated, shall enforce all of the provisions of this code relating to such refuge, and institute and assist in prosecutions for violations thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.

Any refuge designated as a “fish and game refuge” shall be considered, for the purposes of this division, as both a game refuge and a fish refuge.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

10510.

No specification of an open season in any area authorizes the taking of a bird, mammal, fish, amphibian, or reptile from a refuge within that area from which the taking is prohibited by this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 99.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10511.

Except as they may conflict with refuge provisions, the provisions of this code relating to a particular fish and game district shall apply to each refuge lying wholly, or in major part, within the boundaries of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

10512.

The department shall cause to be prepared suitable notices to be posted under its direction on each state game refuge, containing a warning to all persons to refrain for the period named therein from violations of the provisions of this chapter relating to state game refuges.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

10513.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as prohibiting or preventing a person from taking a bird, mammal, fish, amphibian, or reptile from or on navigable water in a state game refuge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 100.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10514.

All state game refuges shall, for all purposes of protecting birds, mammals, fish, amphibians, or reptiles thereon, be under the control and management of the department, and the officers and employees of the department, all game wardens, and law enforcement officers may at all times enter in and upon state game refuges in the performance of their duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 101.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Special Provisions for Given Areas [10650. - 10667.]

10650.

In Mt. Tamalpais Game Refuge, the lawful occupant of privately owned land, or the employees of such occupant, may take on such lands, predatory, or destructive birds and mammals which are not protected or fostered by any of the laws of this State, and are not required to obtain permits for such taking.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

10651.

In the Mt. Tamalpais Game Refuge firearms may be possessed and used by members of any high school militia while on the grounds of the high school at which time they may be enrolled.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

10652.

In the Mt. Tamalpais Game Refuge, no threatened, endangered, or fully-protected birds or mammals may be taken under any permit issued by the department.

Except for wild pigs, it is unlawful to take any bird or mammal under a permit issued by the department unless the person possessing the permit is accompanied by a member of the commission, a deputy of the department, or a sheriff or deputy sheriff of Marin County.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1180, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10653.

In the San Francisco Fish and Game Refuge, birds, mammals, fish, amphibians, and reptiles legally possessed may be carried openly by persons traveling through the refuge on public roads, between one-half hour before sunrise and one-half hour after sunset.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 180.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10654.

Nothing in this division prevents the full use of the land included in the San Francisco Fish and Game Refuge for water supply purposes, nor prohibits any authorized employee of the San Francisco water department from carrying out reasonable measures as may be necessary for the protection of the water supply or the prevention of pollution of the streams or reservoirs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 181.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10655.

(a) A person involved in oceanographic and scientific research in and around Santa Catalina Island may be authorized by the Director of the Catalina Marine Science Center Marine Life Refuge to enter the Catalina Marine Science Center Marine Life Refuge and to anchor or moor a vessel therein.

(b) The Director of the Catalina Marine Science Center Marine Life Refuge, or any person that the Director of the Catalina Marine Science Center Marine Life Refuge has authorized under Section 10502.8, may take, for scientific purposes, any fish or specimen of marine plant life under the conditions prescribed by the department under Section 10502.8.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 682, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

10655.5.

(a) Except as expressly provided in this division, it is unlawful to enter the Catalina Marine Science Center Marine Life Refuge for the purpose of taking or possessing any fish or marine plants or to take or possess any fish or marine plants in the Catalina Marine Science Center Marine Life Refuge.

(b) Except as permitted by federal law or emergency caused by hazardous weather, it is unlawful to anchor or moor a vessel in the Catalina Marine Science Center Marine Life Refuge without authorization by the Director of the Catalina Marine Science Center Marine Life Refuge pursuant to Section 10502.8.

(c) Section 10655 and this section do not prohibit or restrict navigation in the Catalina Marine Science Center Marine Life Refuge pursuant to federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 682, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10656.

(a) Except as expressly provided in this division, it is unlawful to enter the Bodega Marine Life Refuge for the purpose of taking or possessing any fish, marine invertebrate, or marine plant, or to take or possess any fish, marine invertebrate, or marine plant in the Bodega Marine Life Refuge.

(b) Except as permitted by federal law or emergency caused by hazardous weather, it is unlawful to anchor or moor a vessel in the Bodega Marine Life Refuge without authorization by the Director of the Bodega Marine Life Refuge pursuant to Section 10502.7.

(c) This section does not prohibit or restrict navigation in the Bodega Marine Life Refuge pursuant to federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 502, Sec. 5.   Effective September 27, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

10657.

(a) A person may be permitted by the Director of the Hopkins Marine Life Refuge to enter the Hopkins Marine Life Refuge under a permit.

(b) The Director of the Hopkins Marine Life Refuge, or any person to whom the Director of the Hopkins Marine Life Refuge has issued a permit under Section 10502.5, may take, for scientific purposes, any fish or specimen of marine plant life under the conditions prescribed by the department under Section 10502.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1069, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

10657.5.

Except as expressly provided in this division, it is unlawful to enter the Hopkins Marine Life Refuge for the purpose of taking or possessing any fish or marine plants or to take or possess any fish or marine plants in the Hopkins Marine Life Refuge.

Section 10657 and this section do not prohibit or restrict navigation in the Hopkins Marine Life Refuge pursuant to federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1069, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10658.

In the San Diego Marine Life Refuge, licensees of the Regents of the University of California and all officers, employees, and students of such university may take, for scientific purposes, any invertebrate or specimen of marine plant life without a permit from the department.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

10659.

In the California Sea Otter Game Refuge, the lawful occupant of privately owned land, or the employees of such occupant, may possess firearms and traps and may take on such lands any nonprotected bird or mammal, and no permit is required for such taking.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10660.

(a) In the Pacific Grove Marine Gardens Fish Refuge, fish, other than mollusks and crustaceans, may be taken under the authority of a sport fishing license as authorized by this code.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, holders of scientific collectors’ permits issued by the commission, or students working under their direction, may take marine life for scientific purposes in this refuge.

(c) In this refuge, sardines, mackerel, anchovies, squid and herring may be taken by ring net, lampara net or bait net as authorized by this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 367, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10661.

In the Bodega Marine Life Refuge, licensees of the Regents of the University of California and all officers, employees, and students of such university may take, for scientific purposes, any invertebrate or specimen of marine plant life without a permit from the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1303.)
-------------------------------------------

10662.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, it shall be unlawful for any person to fire a firearm, but it shall not be unlawful to possess a firearm, in the following areas:

All of T. 5 S., R. 5 E., except Sections 1, 2, 11, 12, and 13, of Game Refuge 4D.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 182.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10663.

In Fish and Game Refuge 4-D the lawful occupant of privately owned lands or the employees of such occupants may possess firearms without a permit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 973.)
-------------------------------------------

10664.

In the Laguna Beach, Newport Beach, Point Fermin, South Laguna Beach, Niguel, Irvine Coast, and Doheny Beach Marine Life Refuges, the following fish, mollusks, and crustaceans may be taken under the authority of a sportfishing license as authorized by this code: abalone, lobster, rockfish (Scorpaenidae), greenling, ling cod, cabezon, yellowtail, mackerel, bluefin tuna, kelp bass, spotted sand bass, barred sand bass, sargo, croaker, queenfish, corbina, white seabass, opaleye, halfmoon, surfperch (Embiotocidae), blacksmith, barracuda, sheephead, bonito, California halibut, sole, turbot, and sanddab. Fin fish shall be taken only by hook and line or by spearfishing gear. All other fish and forms of aquatic life are protected and may not be taken without a written permit from the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 259, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

10665.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, in the Johnsville Game Refuge it shall be unlawful for any person to discharge a firearm or other device capable of killing or injuring any animal. However, it shall not be unlawful for the lawful occupants of privately owned lands or the employees of such occupants to possess firearms or other devices capable of killing or injuring an animal without a permit.

Birds and animals lawfully taken and possessed outside of the boundaries of the Johnsville Game Refuge may be possessed within the refuge.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 124.)
-------------------------------------------

10666.

In the James V. Fitzgerald Marine Reserve, the following fish and mollusks may be taken under the authority of a sport fishing license as authorized by this code: abalone, rockfish (Sebastes), lingcod, surfperch (Embiotocidae), monkeyface eel, rock eel, white croaker, halibut, cabezon (Scorpaenichthys marmoratus), kelp greenling (Hexagrammos decagrammus), and smelt (Osmeridae and Antherinidae). No such fish having fins may be taken except by hook and line or by spearfishing. All other fish and forms of aquatic life are protected and may not be taken without a written permit from the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 492, Sec. 1.   Effective September 16, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

10667.

(a) In the Dana Point Marine Life Refuge below the intertidal zone, the following fish, mollusks, and crustaceans may be taken under the authority of a sportfishing license as authorized by this code: abalone (subject to the moratorium imposed under Section 5521), lobster, rockfish (Scorpaenidae), greenling, ling cod, cabezon, yellowtail, mackerel, bluefin tuna, kelp bass, spotted sand bass, barred sand bass, sargo, croaker, queenfish, corbina, white seabass, opaleye, halfmoon, surfperch (Embiotocidae), blacksmith, barracuda, sheephead, bonito, California halibut, sole, turbot, and sanddab. Fin fish shall be taken only by hook and line or by spearfishing gear. All other fish and forms of aquatic life are protected and may not be taken without a written permit from the department.

(b) Except as expressly provided in this section, it is unlawful to enter the intertidal zone in the Dana Point Marine Life Refuge for the purpose of taking or possessing, or to take or possess, any species of fish, plant, or invertebrate, or part thereof, to use or have in possession any contrivance designed to be used for catching fish, to disturb any native plant, fish, wildlife, aquatic organism, or to take or disturb any natural geological feature. This subdivision does not prohibit persons from entering the intertidal zone for the purpose of entertainment, recreation, and education while having a minimum impact on the intertidal environment and the living organisms therein. For this purpose, minimum impact includes foot traffic, general observation of organisms in their environment with immediate replacement of any unattached organisms to their natural location after temporary lifting for examination, and photography. Minimum impact does not include removal of attached organisms from their environment, gathering of fishing bait, littering, collecting rocks and shells, or turning rocks or other acts destructive to the environment.

(c) For the purposes of this section, “intertidal zone” means the area of the refuge between the mean lower low-water mark and the mean high-tide line described in Section 10907.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) or (b), the Director of the Dana Point Marine Life Refuge, or any person, who has a scientific collector’s permit from the department, to whom the Director of the Dana Point Marine Life Refuge has issued a permit pursuant to Section 10502.6, may take, for scientific purposes, any fish or specimen of marine plant life under the conditions prescribed by the department pursuant to Section 10502.6.

(e) This section does not prohibit the entry of state and local law enforcement officers, fire suppression agencies, and employees of the department in the performance of their official duties. This section does not prohibit or restrict navigation in the Dana Point Marine Life Refuge pursuant to federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 573, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Federal Bird Reservations [10680. - 10685.]

10680.

The people of the State, through their legislative authority, accept the provisions and benefits of the act of Congress known as the “Migratory Bird Conservation Act,” approved February 18, 1929. Upon approval by the commission, they consent to the acquisition by the United States, by purchase, lease, gift, or devise, of such areas of land, water, or land and water, within the State, as the United States or its properly constituted officers or agents may deem necessary for migratory bird reservations in carrying out the provisions of such act of Congress; saving and reserving, however, to the State such full and complete jurisdiction and authority over all such areas as are not incompatible with the administration, maintenance, protection, and control thereof by the United States under the terms of such act of Congress, and saving and reserving to all persons within such areas all rights, privileges, and immunities under the laws of the State, insofar as they are compatible with the administration, maintenance, protection, and control of such areas by the United States under the terms of such act of Congress.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

10681.

Prior to such approval by the commission, the legislative body of the county concerned shall have given its written consent to the commission for the proposed acquisition.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

10682.

If in any year, on lands hereafter acquired, the in lieu payments from the United States to the county, pursuant to the provisions of law, do not equal the taxes assessed on a given project, the department shall pay from income derived from hunting privileges on the project an amount equal to the balance of the taxes on the entire project.

For the purposes of this section, the taxes on a given project are the assessed taxes on the project at the time of acquisition, plus any subsequent increases that may accrue from general county increases in the tax rates, but not subject to re-evaluation of such project properties after the time of acquisition.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

10683.

The consent of the State to the acquisition by the United States of land, water, or land and water for migratory bird reservations in accordance with this article, is subject to the condition that the United States conform to the laws of the State relating to the acquisition, control, use, and distribution of water with respect to the land acquired.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

10684.

The consent contained in Section 10680 continues only so long as the property continues to belong to the United States and is held by it in accordance and in compliance with each and all of the conditions and reservations as prescribed in this article, and is used for the purposes for which it was acquired.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

10685.

With the approval of the commission, the people of the State, through their legislative authority, also consent to the declaration, withdrawal, or determination of any part of any national forest or power site, and do further consent to the condemnation of any lands lying and being below an elevation known and described as minus 230-foot elevation below sea level, as a migratory bird reservation under the provisions of the act of Congress cited in Section 10680.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Clam Refuges [10711. - 10711.]

10711.

The commission may close for the taking of clams not less than eight land miles of pismo clam bearing beaches within San Luis Obispo County as a clam refuge, but not more than 50 percent of any individual pismo clam bearing beach or beaches may be so closed at any time. The commission may from time to time vary the location of the closed and open portions of those beaches.

Before the commission closes, opens, or varies the location of the closed and open portions of pismo clam bearing beaches, one or more members of the commission shall hold in the county to be affected a public hearing, notice of which has been published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation, printed, and published in that county. The commission may determine which newspaper will be most likely to give notice to the inhabitants of the county, and its determination shall be final and conclusive. The commission may authorize any employee of the department in its place to hold the hearings, in which event a copy of a transcript of all proceedings taken or had at the hearing shall be furnished to each commissioner at least five days before any regulation is made by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 385, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Wilderness Areas [10740. - 10741.]

10740.

It is unlawful for any person other than a legally constituted peace officer or officer or employee of the Forest Service of the United States Department of Agriculture, the department, or of the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, or county fish and game wardens or their duly authorized representatives, to travel by motor boat, automobile, motorcycle, or other type of motorized vehicle, or, except for emergencies and for rescue and aerial search for rescue purposes, to land an airplane, helicopter, or similar equipment, within the boundaries of a primitive, wilderness, or wild area closed to the above modes of travel as established by a duly authorized officer of the Forest Service of the United States Department of Agriculture and recorded in the office of the Regional Headquarters of the Pacific-Southwest Region of the Forest Service of the United States Department of Agriculture and with the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 427, Sec. 42.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

10741.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), nothing in this article prohibits access by a person over a road or trail, in an area described in Section 10740, to reach land that person lawfully possesses. A person allowed access over a road or trail pursuant to this subdivision may authorize another person to do the same.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), none of the motorized vehicles or aircraft mentioned in Section 10740 may be used by any person as a means of gaining access to the wilderness areas for the purpose of hunting or fishing. Nor shall anyone having a lawful right to enter a wilderness area with a motorized vehicle or aircraft fish or hunt while within the area after having entered the area with a motorized
 vehicle or aircraft.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 183.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Specific Refuge Boundaries [10770. - 10932.]



  ARTICLE 1. Fish and Game Refuges [10770. - 10771.]

10770.

The area described in this article is a fish and game refuge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 184.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10771.

The following constitutes and shall be designated the San Francisco Fish and Game Refuge: All that area within the County of San Mateo, within the following boundaries:

Beginning at a point on the westerly side of the Skyline Boulevard where said line crosses the fence line between the properties of the San Francisco Water Department and the Jersey farm, thence following southerly the westerly line of the Skyline Boulevard to the northerly line of the property of the Panama Realty Company, thence following in a generally southerly direction the easterly line of the property of the San Francisco Water Department to the center of the Canada Road, thence due west to the westerly line of said Canada Road, thence southerly along the westerly line of said road to the southerly line of the property of the San Francisco Water Department, thence westerly following the southerly line of the San Francisco Water Department to the Skyline Boulevard, thence northerly following the easterly line of the Skyline Boulevard to its intersection with the easterly line of the Carry E. Bridge property, thence following northerly the easterly line of the said Carry E. Bridge property to its intersection with the easterly line of the Skyline Boulevard, thence northerly following the easterly line of the said Skyline Boulevard to the Half Moon Bay Road, thence crossing the said Skyline Boulevard and said Half Moon Bay Road to the westerly line of the property of the San Francisco Water Department on the northerly side of said Half Moon Bay Road, thence following the westerly line of the San Francisco Water Department in a generally northwesterly direction to the point of beginning.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Fish Refuges [10801. - 10801.]

10801.

The following constitutes the Pacific Grove Marine Gardens Fish Refuge:

 All that area within the following boundaries as they existed April 1, 1963, not within the Hopkins Marine Life Refuge: Beginning at the point of intersection of the southeasterly corporate limit line of the City of Pacific Grove prolongated, and the line of mean high tide of the Bay of Monterey; thence northwesterly along said line of mean high tide to Point Pinos and continuing around said point in a westerly direction and continuing southwesterly along said line of mean high tide to the intersection with the southwesterly corporate limit line prolongated of said city; thence N. 70° 45´ 00″ W. along said southwesterly corporate limit line prolongated to a point in the Pacific Ocean where the depth of water in said ocean is sixty (60) feet measured from the level of mean low tide; thence northwesterly along the line in said ocean which line is at a constant depth of sixty (60) feet measured from the level of mean low tide to Point Pinos and continuing around said point in an easterly direction and continuing southeasterly along the line in said bay which line is at a constant depth of sixty (60) feet measured from the level of mean low tide, to the intersection with the southeasterly corporate limit line of said city prolongated; thence S. 58° 57´ 45″ W. along said southeasterly corporate limit line prolongated, to the point of beginning.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 367, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Game Refuges [10820. - 10844.]

10820.

(a) The areas described in this article are game refuges.

(b) An existing reference to a “Fish and Game District” that is a game refuge shall be construed to refer to the “Game Refuge” that continues the former district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 185.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10821.

The following constitutes Game Refuge 1C: All that area within the County of Modoc within the following boundaries:

Beginning at the boundary of the Modoc National Forest on the east side of Sec. 28, T. 42 N., R. 14 E., where Parker Creek crosses the national forest boundary and following thence Parker Creek and the South Fork of Parker Creek to the summit of the Warner Mountains; thence southerly along the summit of the Warner Mountains to the headwaters of Mill Creek; thence following course of Mill Creek to Mill Creek Ranger Station and Mill Creek stock corrals in approximately Sec. 15, T. 40 N., R. 15 E. (unsurveyed); thence along road from Mill Creek Ranger Station and stock corrals running north of Cantrell’s sawmill to Bowman Ranch, thence along same road to the